Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska26-114
Protection order; copies; distribution; sheriff; duties; dismissal or modification; clerk of court; duties; notice requirements.

(1)(a) Upon the issuance of a temporary ex parte protection order or final protection order, the clerk of the court shall forthwith provide, free of charge:

(i) The petitioner with two certified copies of such order;

(ii) The local police department or local law enforcement agency and the local sheriff's office with one copy each of such order and one copy each of the sheriff's return thereon; and

(iii) A copy of the protection order to the sheriff's office in the county where the respondent may be personally served, together with instructions for service.

(b) Upon receipt of the order and instructions for service, the sheriff's office in the county where the respondent may be personally served shall forthwith serve the protection order upon the respondent and file its return thereon with the clerk of the court which issued the protection order within fourteen days of the issuance of the protection order.

(2) If any protection order is dismissed or modified by the court, the clerk of the court shall forthwith provide the local police department or local law enforcement agency and the local sheriff's office, without charge, with one copy each of the order of dismissal or modification.

(3) Any document required to be provided under this section, including certified copies of protection orders, may be provided electronically.

(4) If the respondent was present at a hearing convened pursuant to section 26-108 or 26-109 and the court entered a final protection order at such hearing, the respondent shall be deemed to have notice of the protection order and further service of notice described in this section is not required for purposes of prosecution under section 26-118.

Laws 1978, LB 623, § 26;

Laws 1989, LB 330, § 9;

Laws 1998, LB 218, § 24;

Laws 2012, LB310, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB532, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,2024, § 42-926;

Laws 2025, LB80, § 14;

Laws 2026, LB935, § 10.
July 18, 2026